District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-3221

Effective date of subchapter I.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-58, § 401, 24 DCR 5765
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Aug. 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-142, § 3(i), 45 DCR 4826

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-3221.
1973 Ed., § 47-3113.

Editor's Notes

Pub. L. 105-227, § 2, Aug. 12, 1998, 112 Stat. 1515, provided: “Notwithstanding section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, the Washington Convention Center Authority Financing Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. 12-402) shall take effect on the date of the enactment of this Act.”